Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 2. Acknowledgment and Proof.

Sec. 34.15.150.
Execution of conveyances.

A conveyance executed in the state of land or an interest in land in the state shall be acknowledged before a person authorized to take acknowledgments in AS

09.63.010

or proved in accordance with AS

34.15.210

or

34.15.220

. The officer taking an acknowledgment shall endorse on it a certificate of the acknowledgment of the conveyance and the date of making the acknowledgment.

A conveyance executed before March 12, 1953, in due form but without two witnesses is validated, shall be received in evidence in all courts of the state, and is evidence of the title to the land or interest in land against the grantor and the heirs and assigns of the grantor.

History.

(§ 22-3-9 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 29 SLA 1953; am § 1 ch 12 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 37 SLA 1981)

Cross references. —

For acknowledgment as requirement for recording, see AS

40.17.030(b)

; for forms of acknowledgment, see AS

09.63.100

.

Sec. 34.15.160.
Conveyances executed outside the state.

If a conveyance is executed in a state, territory, or district of the United States, the conveyance may be executed according to the laws of that state, territory, or district, and the execution of the conveyance may be acknowledged under AS

09.63.050

—

09.63.130

.

History.

(§ 22-3-10 ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 12 SLA 1966; am § 3 ch 37 SLA 1981)

Sec. 34.15.170.
Certificate of acknowledgment. [Repealed, § 6 ch 37 SLA 1981.]

Sec. 34.15.180.
Execution and acknowledgment of conveyance in foreign country.

If a conveyance is executed in a foreign country it may be executed according to the laws of that country and the execution of it acknowledged under AS

09.63.050

—

09.63.130

.

History.

(§ 22-3-12 ACLA 1949; am § 18 ch 70 SLA 1964; am § 4 ch 12 SLA 1966; am § 4 ch 37 SLA 1981)

Secs. 34.15.190 — 34.15.200.
Acknowledgment by married person; officer’s knowledge of grantor’s identity.
[Repealed, § 6 ch 37 SLA 1981.
For current law see AS 09.63.]

Sec. 34.15.210.
Proof by subscribing witness.

Proof of the execution of a conveyance may be made before an officer authorized to take acknowledgment of conveyances, and shall be made by a subscribing witness, who shall state the witness’ own place of residence and that the witness knows the person described in and executing the conveyance.

This proof may not be taken unless the officer is personally acquainted with the subscribing witness or has satisfactory evidence that the person is the subscribing witness to the instrument.

History.

(§ 22-3-16 ACLA 1949; am § 5 ch 12 SLA 1966)

Sec. 34.15.220.
Proof of conveyance by handwriting.

When a grantor is dead, out of the state, or refuses to acknowledge the conveyance, and all the subscribing witnesses to the conveyance are also dead or reside out of the state, the conveyance may be proved before the superior court, by proving the handwriting of the grantor and of a subscribing witness to it.

History.

(§ 22-3-17 ACLA 1949; am § 6 ch 12 SLA 1966)

Sec. 34.15.230.
Subpoena of witness.

An officer authorized to take an acknowledgment or proof of conveyance may issue a subpoena requiring a witness to a conveyance to appear and testify before the officer regarding the execution, upon the application of a grantee, or of a person claiming under the grantee, verified by the oath of the applicant, setting out that

the grantor is dead, out of the state, or refuses to acknowledge the conveyance;

a witness to the conveyance refuses to appear and testify regarding the execution of the conveyance; and

the conveyance cannot be proved without the evidence of the witness.

History.

(§ 22-3-18 ACLA 1949; am § 7 ch 12 SLA 1966)

Sec. 34.15.240.
Penalty for refusal to appear or testify.

A person served with a subpoena described in AS

34.15.230

who, without reasonable cause, refuses or neglects to appear, or upon appearing refuses to answer upon oath regarding the execution of a deed, shall forfeit to the injured party $100, and may also be committed to jail for a contempt by the officer who issues the subpoena, to remain in jail until the person submits to answer on oath as required.

History.

(§ 22-3-19 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.15.250.
Endorsement by officer.

An officer taking the proof of a conveyance shall certify it, sign it, and in the certificate shall set out the things required by this chapter to be done, known, or proved, together with the names of the witnesses examined before the officer, their places of residence, and the substance of the evidence given by them.

History.

(§ 22-3-20 ACLA 1949)